Utah statutes.
76-5-407.   Applicability of part -- "Penetration" or "touching" sufficient to constitute offense.

(1)  The provisions of this part do not apply to consensual conduct between persons married to each other.

(2)  In any prosecution for:

(a)  the following offenses, any sexual penetration, however slight, is sufficient to constitute the relevant element of the offense:

(i)  unlawful sexual activity with a minor, a violation of Section 76-5-401, involving sexual intercourse;

(ii)  unlawful sexual conduct with a 16 or 17 year old, a violation of Subsection 76-5-401.2, involving sexual intercourse; or

(iii)  rape, a violation of Section 76-5-402; or

(b)  the following offenses, any touching, however slight, is sufficient to constitute the relevant element of the offense:

(i)  unlawful sexual activity with a minor, a violation of Section 76-5-401, involving acts of sodomy;

(ii)  unlawful sexual conduct with a 16 or 17 year old, a violation of Section 76-5-401.2, involving acts of sodomy;

(iii)  sodomy, a violation of Subsection 76-5-403(1);

(iv)  forcible sodomy, a violation of Subsection 76-5-403(2);

(v)  rape of a child, a violation of Section 76-5-402.1; or

(vi)  object rape of a child, a violation of Section 76-5-402.3.

(3)  In any prosecution for the following offenses, any touching, even if accomplished through clothing, is sufficient to constitute the relevant element of the offense:

(a)  sodomy on a child, a violation of Section 76-5-403.1; or

(b)  sexual abuse of a child or aggravated sexual abuse of a child, a violation of Section 76-5-404.1.

